District of Columbia statutes.
26-551.19

Enforcement of Department order, subpoena, or notice of charges.

The Commissioner may, through the Corporation Counsel, apply to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for the enforcement of an effective and outstanding notice of charges, subpoena, final cease and desist order, or temporary cease and desist order. The Superior Court of the District of Columbia may order compliance with the notice of charges, subpoena, final cease and desist order, or temporary cease and desist order.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 119, 48 DCR 3244

History